Washington statutes.
RCW 36.71.030

Peddler's license—Record of applications.

The appropriate county official of each county shall keep on file all applications for peddlers' licenses that are issued. All files and records shall be in convenient form and open to public inspection.

[ 1985 c 91 s 4; 1963 c 4 s 36.71.030. Prior: 1909 c 214 s 4; RRS s 8356.]